New York, session 2025-2026, S7846.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature hereby 2 finds that the state requires a comprehensive approach to science, tech- 3 nology, engineering, and math education (STEM). Under current law, 4 little to no incentives or programmatic funding exists to push STEM 5 education forward. The legislature further finds it essential to bring 6 back business and industry in STEM education programs by getting them 7 involved for career development. Furthermore, the legislature finds it 8 questionable whether current curriculum focuses on the adequate areas to 9 provide children with the standards needed to fulfill a math or science 10 job opportunity in the future. 11 Therefore be it resolved that the legislature intends to mirror the 12 federal efforts underway to promote STEM and enable New York students to 13 compete internationally in educational fields that drive the global 14 economy and to provide the appropriate funding for STEM programs. 15 § 2. Section 669-e of the education law, as amended by section 1 of 16 part BB of chapter 56 of the laws of 2018, subdivision 1 as amended by 17 chapter 329 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 18 § 669-e. New York state science, technology, engineering and mathemat- 19 ics incentive program. 1. Undergraduate students who are matriculated in 20 an approved undergraduate program leading to a career in science, 21 computer science, technology, engineering, including design skills and 22 practice, or mathematics at a New York state public institution of high- 23 er education for the purpose of subdivision two of this section, or a 24 New York state private degree granting institution of higher education 25 for the purpose of subdivision two-a of this section, shall be eligible EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10961-01-5 S. 7846 2 1 for an award under this section, provided the applicant: (a) graduates 2 from a high school located in New York state during or after the two 3 thousand thirteen--fourteen school year; and (b) graduates within the 4 top ten percent of [his or her] the applicant's high school class; and 5 (c) enrolls in full-time study each term beginning in the fall term 6 after [his or her] the applicant's high school graduation in an approved 7 undergraduate program in science, computer science, technology, engi- 8 neering, including design skills and practice, or mathematics, as 9 defined by the corporation, at a New York state institution of higher 10 education; and (d) signs a contract with the corporation agreeing that 11 [his or her] the applicant's award will be converted to a student loan 12 in the event the student fails to comply with the terms of this program 13 as set forth in subdivision four of this section; and (e) complies with 14 the applicable provisions of this article and all requirements promul- 15 gated by the corporation for the administration of the program. 16 2. Awards shall be granted beginning with the two thousand fourteen-- 17 two thousand fifteen academic year and thereafter to applicants at New 18 York state public institutions of higher education that the corporation 19 has determined are eligible to receive such awards. The corporation 20 shall grant such awards in an amount equal to the amount of undergradu- 21 ate tuition for residents of New York state charged by the state univer- 22 sity of New York or actual tuition charged, whichever is less; provided, 23 however, (i) a student who receives educational grants and/or scholar- 24 ships that cover the student's full cost of attendance shall not be 25 eligible for an award under this program; (ii) for a student who 26 receives educational grants and/or scholarships that cover less than the 27 student's full cost of attendance, such grants and/or scholarships shall 28 not be deemed duplicative of this program and may be held concurrently 29 with an award under this program, provided that the combined benefits do 30 not exceed the student's full cost of attendance; and (iii) an award 31 under this program shall be applied to tuition after the application of 32 all other educational grants and scholarships limited to tuition and 33 shall be reduced in an amount equal to such educational grants and/or 34 scholarships. Upon notification of an award under this program, the 35 institution shall defer the amount of tuition equal to the award. No 36 award shall be final until the recipient's successful completion of a 37 term has been certified by the institution. 38 2-a. Within amounts appropriated therefor and based on availability of 39 funds, beginning with the two thousand eighteen--two thousand nineteen 40 academic year and thereafter, awards shall be granted to applicants at 41 New York state private degree granting institutions of higher education 42 that the corporation has determined are eligible to receive such awards. 43 The corporation shall grant such awards in an amount equal to the amount 44 of undergraduate tuition for residents of New York state charged by the 45 state university of New York or actual tuition charged, whichever is 46 less; provided, however, (i) a student who receives educational grants 47 and/or scholarships that cover the student's full cost of attendance 48 shall not be eligible for an award under this program; (ii) for a 49 student who receives educational grants and/or scholarships that cover 50 less than the student's full cost of attendance, such grants and/or 51 scholarships shall not be deemed duplicative of this program and may be 52 held concurrently with an award under this program, provided that the 53 combined benefits do not exceed the student's full cost of attendance; 54 and (iii) an award under this program shall be applied to tuition after 55 the application of all other educational grants and scholarships limited 56 to tuition and shall be reduced in an amount equal to such educational S. 7846 3 1 grants and/or scholarships. Upon notification of an award under this 2 program, the institution shall defer the amount of tuition equal to the 3 award. No award shall be final until the recipient's successful 4 completion of a term has been certified by the institution. 5 3. An eligible recipient shall not receive an award for more than four 6 academic years of full-time undergraduate study or five academic years 7 if the program of study normally requires five years, excluding any 8 allowable interruption of study. 9 4. The corporation shall convert to a student loan the full amount of 10 the award given pursuant to this section, plus interest, according to a 11 schedule to be determined by the corporation if: (a) a recipient fails 12 to complete an approved undergraduate program in science, computer 13 science, technology, engineering, including design skills and practice, 14 or mathematics or changes majors to a program of undergraduate study 15 other than in science, computer science, technology, engineering, 16 including design skills and practice, or mathematics; or (b) upon 17 completion of such undergraduate degree program a recipient fails to 18 either (i) complete five years of continuous full time employment in the 19 science, computer science, technology, engineering, including design 20 skills and practice, or mathematics field with a public or private enti- 21 ty located within New York state, or (ii) maintain residency in New York 22 state for such period of employment; or (c) a recipient fails to respond 23 to requests by the corporation for the status of [his or her] the recip- 24 ient's academic or professional progress. The terms and conditions of 25 this subdivision shall be deferred for individuals who graduate with a 26 degree in an approved undergraduate program in science, computer 27 science, technology, engineering, including design skills and practice, 28 or mathematics and enroll on at least a half-time basis in a graduate or 29 higher degree program or other professional licensure degree program 30 until they are conferred a degree, and shall also be deferred for any 31 interruption in undergraduate study or employment as established by the 32 rules and regulations of the corporation. The terms and conditions of 33 this subdivision may also be deferred for a grace period, to be estab- 34 lished by the corporation, following the completion of an approved 35 undergraduate program in science, computer science, technology, engi- 36 neering, including design skills and practice, or mathematics a graduate 37 or higher degree program or other professional licensure degree program. 38 Any obligation to comply with such provisions as outlined in this 39 section shall be cancelled upon the death of the recipient. Notwith- 40 standing any provisions of this subdivision to the contrary, the corpo- 41 ration is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to provide for 42 the waiver or suspension of any financial obligation which would involve 43 extreme hardship. 44 5. The corporation is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations, 45 and may promulgate emergency regulations, necessary for the implementa- 46 tion of the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, 47 the rate of interest charged for repayment of the student loan and the 48 criteria for distributing the awards, which may include a lottery or 49 other form of random selection for awards distributed pursuant to subdi- 50 vision two-a of this section. 51 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.